Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
G. Attorney General

§ 17-19-170.
Attorney general.

The secretary of state shall be given notice of the commencement of any proceeding that this act authorizes the attorney general to bring but that has been commenced by another person.

Whenever any provision of this act requires that notice be given to the secretary of state before or after commencing a proceeding or permits the attorney general to commence a proceeding:

If no proceeding has been commenced, the attorney general may take appropriate action including, but not limited to, seeking injunctive relief;

If a proceeding has been commenced by a person other than the attorney general, the attorney general, as of right, may intervene in such proceeding.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a) and in the introductory language of subsection (b), see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxviii).